Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.133

Qualified.

"Qualified" when pertaining to a winner of an election means that for such election:

(1) The results have been certified;

(2) Any required bond has been posted; and

(3) The winner has taken and subscribed an oath or affirmation in compliance with the appropriate statute, or if none is specified, that he or she will faithfully and impartially discharge the duties of the office to the best of his or her ability. This oath or affirmation shall be administered and certified by any officer or notary public authorized to administer oaths, without charge therefor.

[ 2007 c 374 s 1; 2003 c 111 s 123. Prior: 1979 ex.s. c 126 s 2. Formerly RCW 29.01.135.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1979 ex.s. c 126: See RCW 29A.60.280(1).